Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5352.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-1.7 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Program to
Address Alzheimer’s Disease" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
23-1.7-7. Creation of dementia services coordinator.
(a) The department of health shall establish a dementia services coordinator that shall be a
full-time position within state government and shall be in the classified service.
(b) The dementia services coordinator shall have the following duties:
(1) Coordinate the department's approach to addressing Alzheimer's disease and other
forms of dementia including, but not limited to, public awareness, prevention, and early detection;
(2) Oversee the implementation and updating of the Rhode Island Alzheimer's disease and
related disorder state plan;
(3) Assess and analyze dementia-related data collected by the state;
(4) Evaluate state-funded dementia services;
(5) Identify and support the provision of dementia-specific training programs;
(6) Establish and maintain relationships with agencies, providers, and organizations within
the state in order to meet the needs of those affected by dementia and prevent the duplication of
services and initiatives;
(7) Recommend strategies to improve coordination of dementia-related services and
resources provided by public and private entities;

(8) Recommend strategies to improve coordination of dementia-related services and
resources provided by public and private entities;
(9) Identify grant opportunities to expand services for persons living the dementia as
determined by the department; and
(10) Carry out other duties relevant to the support of individuals with dementia and their
caregivers as determined by the department.
(b) The dementia services coordinator shall work in coordination with the advisory council
on Alzheimer's disease and related disorders created pursuant to § 23-1.7-2.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001177
========
LC001177 - Page 2 of 3